Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
CHAPTER 17 Notaries Public

Editor’s notes.

— For application of this chapter in 2020, see Executive Orders 03.31.20.01 and 04.09.20.01.

Cross references.

Criminal penalty for making false acknowledgments, §

16-10-7

.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this chapter in 2020, see Executive Orders 03.31.20.01 and 04.09.20.01.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.